Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,145
Local trucks; registration fees.

(1) The registration fee on local trucks shall be based on the gross vehicle weight as provided in section 60-3,147, and local trucks shall be registered at a fee of thirty percent of the commercial motor vehicle registration fee, except that (a) no local truck shall be registered for a fee of less than eighteen dollars, (b) the registration fee for each truck with a factory-rated capacity of one ton or less shall be eighteen dollars, and (c) commercial pickup trucks with a gross load of over three tons shall be registered for the fee provided for commercial motor vehicles.

(2) Local truck license plates shall display, in addition to the registration number, the designation of local motor vehicles.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 145;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 49.